Tennessee statutes. Title 58 Military Affairs, Emergencies and Civil Defense
Part 4

Civil Defense Compacts

58-2-401. Authority for compact.

The governor is hereby authorized in the name of the state of Tennessee to enter into civil defense and disaster compacts with the several states, and to enter into an emergency management assistance compact by and between participating states, in order to provide mutual aid among the contracting states in meeting any emergency or disaster from enemy attack, sabotage or other hostile action.

Acts 1951, ch. 160, § 1 (Williams, § 5755.56); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-701; Acts 1995, ch. 247, § 1; 2010, ch. 745, § 1.

Cross-References. Interstate lease or loan of state property and transfer of state personnel in event of emergency, § 58-2-117.

Political subdivisions authorized to enter into mutual aid agreements with civil defense agencies or organizations of other states, § 58-2-120.

58-2-402. Text of compact.

The civil defense and disaster compact referred to in § 58-2-401 which the governor of this state is authorized to execute on behalf of the state of Tennessee is as follows:

CIVIL DEFENSE AND DISASTER COMPACT

The contracting states solemnly agree:

Article 1.

The purpose of this compact is to provide mutual aid among the states in meeting any emergency or disaster from enemy attack, including sabotage and subversive acts and direct attacks by bombs, shellfire, and atomic, radiological, chemical, bacteriological means, and other weapons. The prompt, full and effective utilization of the resources of the respective states, including such resources as may be available from the United States government or any other source are essential to the safety, care and welfare of the people thereof in the event of enemy attack or other emergency, and any other resources, including personnel, equipment or supplies, shall be incorporated into a plan or plans of mutual aid to be developed among the civil defense agencies or similar bodies of the states that are parties hereto. The directors of civil defense of all party states shall constitute a committee to formulate plans and take all necessary steps for the implementation of this compact.

Article 2.

It shall be the duty of each party state to formulate civil defense plans and programs for application within such state. There shall be frequent consultation between the representatives of the states and with the United States government and the free exchange of information and plans, including inventories of any materials and equipment available for civil defense. In carrying out such civil defense plans and programs, the party states shall so far as possible provide and follow uniform standards, practices and rules and regulations, including:

Insignia, armbands and any other distinctive articles to designate and distinguish the different civil defense services;

Blackouts and practice blackouts, air-raid drills, mobilization of civil defense forces and other tests and exercises;

Warnings and signals for drill or attacks and the mechanical devices to be used in connection therewith;

The effective screening or extinguishing of all lights and lighting devices and appliances;

Shutting off water mains, gas mains, electric power connections and the suspension of all other utility services;

All materials or equipment used or to be used for civil defense purposes in order to assure that such materials and equipment will be easily and freely interchangeable when used in or by any other party state;

The conduct of civilians and the movement and cessation of movement of pedestrians and vehicular traffic, prior, during and subsequent to drills or attacks;

The safety of public meetings or gatherings; and

Mobile support, or mobile reserve units.

Article 3.

Any party state requested to render mutual aid shall take such action as is necessary to provide and make available the resources covered by this compact in accordance with the terms hereof; provided, that it is understood that the state rendering aid may withhold resources to the extent necessary to provide reasonable protection for such state. Each party state shall extend to the civil defense forces of any other state, while operating within its state limits under the terms and conditions of this compact, the same powers (except that of arrest unless specifically authorized by the receiving state), duties, rights, privileges and immunities as if they were performing their duties in the state in which normally employed or rendering services. Civil defense forces will continue under the command and control of their regular leaders, but the organizational units will come under the operational control of the civil defense authorities of the state receiving assistance.

Article 4.

Whenever any person holds a license, certificate or other permit issued by any state evidencing the meeting of qualifications for professional, mechanical or other skills, such person may render aid involving such skill in any party state to meet an emergency or disaster and such state shall give due recognition to such license, certificate or other permit as if issued in the state in which aid is rendered.

Article 5.

No party state or its officers or employees rendering aid in another state pursuant to this compact shall be liable on account of any act or omission in good faith on the part of such forces while so engaged, or on account of the maintenance or use of any equipment or supplies in connection therewith.

Article 6.

Inasmuch as it is probable that the pattern and detail of the machinery for mutual aid among two (2) or more states may differ from that appropriate among other states party hereto, this instrument contains elements of a broad base common to all states, and nothing herein contained shall preclude any state from entering into supplementary agreements with another state or states. Such supplementary agreements may comprehend, but shall not be limited to, provisions for evacuation and reception of injured and other persons, and the exchange of medical, fire, police, public utility, reconnaissance, welfare, transportation and communications personnel, equipment and supplies.

Article 7.

Each party state shall provide for the payment of compensation and death benefits to injured members of the civil defense forces of that state and the representatives of deceased members of such forces in case such members sustain injuries or are killed while rendering aid pursuant to this compact, in the same manner and on the same terms as if the injury or death were sustained within such state.

Article 8.

Any party state rendering aid in another state pursuant to this compact shall be reimbursed by the party state receiving such aid for any loss or damage to, or expense incurred in, the operation of any equipment answering a request for aid, and for the cost incurred in connection with such requests; provided, that any aiding party state may assume in whole or in part such loss, damage, expense or other cost, or may loan such equipment or donate such services to the receiving party state without charge or cost; and, provided further, that any two (2) or more party states may enter into supplementary agreements establishing a different allocation of costs as among those states. The United States government may relieve the party states receiving aid from any liability and reimburse the party state supplying civil defense forces for the compensation paid to and the transportation, subsistence and maintenance expenses of such forces during the time of the rendition of such aid or assistance outside the state and may also pay fair and reasonable compensation for the use or utilization of the supplies, materials, equipment or facilities so utilized or consumed.

Article 9.

Plans for the orderly evacuation and reception of the civilian population as the result of an emergency or disaster shall be worked out from time to time between representatives of the party states and the various local civil defense areas thereof. Such plans shall include the manner of transporting such evacuees, the number of evacuees to be received in different areas, the manner in which food, clothing, housing and medical care will be provided, the registration of the evacuees, the providing of facilities for the notification of relatives or friends and the forwarding of such evacuees to other areas or the bringing in of additional materials, supplies, and all other relevant factors. Such plans shall provide that the party state receiving evacuees shall be reimbursed generally for the out-of-pocket expenses incurred in receiving and caring for such evacuees, for expenditures for transportation, food, clothing, medicines and medical care and like items. Such expenditures shall be reimbursed by the party state of which the evacuees are residents, or by the United States government under plans approved by it. After the termination of the emergency or disaster, the party state of which the evacuees are resident shall assume the responsibility for the ultimate support or repatriation of such evacuees.

Article 10.

The committee established pursuant to article 1 of this compact may request the civil defense agency of the United States government to act as an informational and coordinating body under this compact, and representatives of such agency of the United States government may attend meetings of such committee.

Article 11.

This compact shall become binding between this state and any contiguous state upon the specific ratification hereof by this state, and such contiguous state as between themselves and shall be subject to approval by congress unless prior congressional approval has been given. Duly authenticated copies of this compact and of such supplementary agreements as may be entered into shall, at the time of their approval, be deposited with each of the party states and with the civil defense agency and other appropriate agencies of the United States government.

Article 12.

This compact shall continue in force and remain binding on each party state until the general assembly or the governor of such party state takes action to withdraw therefrom. Such action shall not be effective until thirty (30) days after notice thereof has been sent by the governor of the party state desiring to withdraw to the governors of all other party states.

Article 13.

This compact shall be construed to effectuate the purposes stated in article 1. If any provision of this compact is declared unconstitutional, or the applicability thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the constitutionality of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

Acts 1951, ch. 160, § 2 (Williams, § 5755.57); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-702.

Compiler's Notes. The Civil Defense and Disaster Compact, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2025. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-246.

Cross-References. Governor authorized to enter into civil defense and mutual aid arrangements with other states, § 58-2-108.

Interstate lease or loan of state property and transfer of state personnel in event of emergency, § 58-2-117.

Reimbursement for expenses of and payments for compensation, death or injury to mobile reserve units from other states, § 58-2-113.

Attorney General Opinions. Ability of out-of-state health care professionals to provide emergency assistance in Tennessee, OAG 07-107 (7/13/07).

58-2-403. Text of Emergency Management Assistance Compact.

The emergency management assistance compact referred to in § 58-2-401 which the governor is authorized to execute on behalf of the state is as follows:

EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT ASSISTANCE COMPACT

ARTICLE I — PURPOSE AND AUTHORITIES

This compact is made and entered into by and between the participating member states which enact this compact, hereinafter called party states. For the purposes of this agreement, the term “states” is taken to mean the several states, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the District of Columbia, and all U.S. territorial possessions.

The purpose of this compact is to provide for mutual assistance between the states entering into this compact in managing any emergency or disaster that is duly declared by the governor of the affected state(s), whether arising from natural disaster, technological hazard, man-made disaster, civil emergency aspects of resources shortages, community disorders, insurgency, or enemy attack.

This compact shall also provide for mutual cooperation in emergency-related exercises, testing, or other training activities using equipment and personnel simulating performance of any aspect of the giving and receiving of aid by party states or subdivisions of party states during emergencies, such actions occurring outside actual declared emergency periods. Mutual assistance in this compact may include the use of the states' National Guard forces, either in accordance with the National Guard Mutual Assistance Compact or by mutual agreement between states.

ARTICLE II — GENERAL IMPLEMENTATION

Each party state entering into this compact recognizes many emergencies transcend political jurisdictional boundaries and the intergovernmental coordination is essential in managing these and other emergencies under this compact. Each state further recognizes that there will be emergencies which require immediate access and present procedures to apply outside resources to make a prompt and effective response to such an emergency. This is because few, if any, individual states have all the resources they may need in all types of emergencies or the capability of delivering resources to areas where emergencies exist.

The prompt, full, and effective utilization of resources of the participating states, including any resources on hand or available from the Federal Government or any other source, that are essential to the safety, care, and welfare of the people in the event of any emergency or disaster declared by a party state, shall be the underlying principle on which all articles of this compact shall be understood.

On behalf of the governor of each state participating in the compact, the legally designated state official who is assigned responsibility for emergency management will be responsible for formulation of the appropriate interstate mutual aid plans and procedures necessary to implement this compact.

ARTICLE III — PARTY STATE RESPONSIBILITIES

A. It shall be the responsibility of each party state to formulate procedural plans and programs for interstate cooperation in the performance of the responsibilities listed in this article. In formulating such plans, and carrying them out, the party states, insofar as practical, shall:

i. Review individual state hazards analyses and, to the extent reasonably possible, determine all those potential emergencies the party states might jointly suffer, whether due to natural disaster, technological hazard, man-made disaster, emergency aspects of resource shortages, civil disorders, insurgency, or enemy attack.

ii. Review party state's individual emergency plans and develop a plan which will determine the mechanism for the interstate management and provision of assistance concerning any potential emergency.

iii. Develop interstate procedures to fill any identified gaps and to resolve any identified inconsistencies or overlaps in existing or developed plans.

iv. Assist in warning communities adjacent to or crossing the state boundaries.

v. Protect and assure uninterrupted delivery of services, medicines, water, food, energy and fuel, search and rescue, and critical lifeline equipment, services, and resources, both human and material.

vi. Inventory and set procedures for the interstate loan and delivery of human and material resources, together with procedures for reimbursement or forgiveness.

vii. Provide, to the extent authorized by law, for temporary suspension of any statutes or ordinances that restrict the implementation of the above responsibilities.

B. The authorized representative of a party state may request assistance of another party state by contacting the authorized representative of that state. The provisions of this agreement shall only apply to requests for assistance made by and to the authorized representative. Requests may be verbal or in writing. If verbal, the request shall be confirmed in writing within thirty (30) days of the verbal request. Requests shall provide the following information:

i. A description of the emergency service function for which assistance is needed, such as but not limited to fire services, law enforcement, emergency medical, transportation, communications, public works and engineering, building inspection, planning and information assistance, mass care, resource support, health and medical services, and search and rescue.

ii. The amount and type of personnel, equipment, materials and supplies needed, and a reasonable estimate of the length of time they will be needed.

iii. The specific place and time for staging of the assisting party's response and a point of contact at that location.

C. There shall be frequent consultation between state officials who have assigned emergency management responsibilities and other appropriate representatives of the party states with affected jurisdictions and the United States Government, with free exchange of information, plans, and resource records relating to emergency capabilities.

ARTICLE IV — LIMITATIONS

Any party state requested to render mutual aid or conduct exercises and training for mutual aid shall take such action as is necessary to provide and make available the resources covered by this compact in accordance with the terms hereof; provided, that it is understood that the state rendering aid may withhold resources to the extent necessary to provide reasonable protection for such state.

Each party state shall afford to the emergency forces of any party state, while operating within its state limits under the terms and conditions of this compact, the same powers (except that of arrest unless specifically authorized by the receiving state), duties, rights, and privileges as are afforded forces of the state in which they are performing emergency services. Emergency forces will continue under the command and control of their regular leaders, but the organizational units will come under the operational control of the emergency services authorities of the state receiving assistance. These conditions may be activated, as needed, only subsequent to a declaration of a state of emergency or disaster by the governor of the party state that is to receive assistance or commencement of exercises or training for mutual aid and shall continue so long as the exercises or training for mutual aid are in progress, the state of emergency or disaster remains in effect or loaned resources remain in the receiving state(s), whichever is longer.

ARTICLE V — LICENSES AND PERMITS

Whenever any person holds a license, certificate, or other permit issued by any state party to the compact evidencing the meeting of qualifications for professional, mechanical, or other skills, and when such assistance is requested by the receiving party state, such person shall be deemed licensed, certified, or permitted by the state requesting assistance to render aid involving such skill to meet a declared emergency or disaster, subject to such limitations and conditions as the governor of the requesting state may prescribe by executive order or otherwise.

ARTICLE VI — LIABILITY

Officers or employees of a party state rendering aid in another state pursuant to this compact shall be considered agents of the requesting state for tort liability and immunity purposes; and no party state or its officers or employees rendering aid in another state pursuant to this compact shall be liable on account of any act or omission in good faith on the part of such forces while so engaged or on account of the maintenance or use of any equipment or supplies in connection therewith. Good faith in this article shall not include willful misconduct, gross negligence, or recklessness.

ARTICLE VII — SUPPLEMENTARY AGREEMENTS

Inasmuch as it is probable that the pattern and detail of the machinery for mutual aid among two or more states may differ from that among the states that are party hereto, this instrument contains elements of a broad base common to all states, and nothing herein contained shall preclude any state from entering into supplementary agreements with another state or affect any other agreements already in force between states. Supplementary agreements may comprehend, but shall not be limited to, provisions for evacuation and reception of injured and other persons and the exchange of medical, fire, police, public utility, reconnaissance, welfare, transportation and communications personnel, and equipment and supplies.

ARTICLE VIII — COMPENSATION

Each party state shall provide for the payment of compensation and death benefits to injured members of the emergency forces of that state and representatives of deceased members of such forces in case such members sustain injuries or are killed while rendering aid pursuant to this compact, in the same manner and on the same terms as if the injury or death were sustained within their own state.

ARTICLE IX — REIMBURSEMENT

Any party state rendering aid in another state pursuant to this compact shall be reimbursed by the party state receiving such aid for any loss or damage to or expense incurred in the operation of any equipment and the provision of any service in answering a request for aid and for the costs incurred in connection with such requests; provided, that any aiding party state may assume in whole or in part such loss, damage, expense, or other cost, or may loan such equipment or donate such services to the receiving party state without charge or cost; and provided further, that any two or more party states may enter into supplementary agreements establishing a different allocation of costs among those states. Article VIII shall not be reimbursable under this provision.

ARTICLE X — EVACUATION

Plans for the orderly evacuation and interstate reception of portions of the civilian population as the result of any emergency or disaster of sufficient proportions to so warrant, shall be worked out and maintained between the party states and the emergency management/services directors of the various jurisdictions where any type of incident requiring evacuations might occur. Such plans shall be put into effect by request of the state from which evacuees come and shall include the manner of transporting such evacuees, the number of evacuees to be received in different areas, the manner in which food, clothing, housing, and medical care will be provided, the registration of the evacuees, the providing of facilities for the notification of relatives or friends, and the forwarding of such evacuees to other areas or the bringing in of additional materials, supplies, and all other relevant factors. Such plans shall provide that the party state receiving evacuees and the party state from which the evacuees come shall mutually agree as to reimbursement of out-of-pocket expenses incurred in receiving and caring for such evacuees, for expenditures for transportation, food, clothing, medicines and medical care, and like items. Such expenditures shall be reimbursed as agreed by the party state from which the evacuees come. After the termination of the emergency or disaster, the party state from which the evacuees come shall assume the responsibility for the ultimate support of repatriation or such evacuees.

ARTICLE XI — IMPLEMENTATION

A. This compact shall become operative immediately upon its enactment into law by any two (2) states; thereafter, this compact shall become effective as to any other state upon its enactment by such state.

B. Any party state may withdraw from this Compact by enacting a statute repealing the same, but no such withdrawal shall take effect until thirty (30) days after the governor of the withdrawing state has given notice in writing of such withdrawal to the governors of all other party states. Such action shall not relieve the withdrawing state from obligations assumed hereunder prior to the effective date of withdrawal.

C. Duly authenticated copies of this compact and of such supplementary agreements as may be entered into shall, at the time of their approval, be deposited with each of the party states and with the Federal Emergency Management Agency and other appropriate agencies of the United States Government.

ARTICLE XII — VALIDITY

Chapter 247 of the Public Acts of 1995 shall be construed to effectuate the purposes stated in Article I hereof. If any provision of this compact is declared unconstitutional, or the applicability thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the constitutionality of the remainder of Chapter 247 of the Public Acts of 1995 and the applicability thereof to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

ARTICLE XIII — ADDITIONAL PROVISIONS

Nothing in this compact shall authorize or permit the use of military force by the National Guard of a state at any place outside that state in any emergency for which the President is authorized by law to call into federal service the militia, or for any purpose for which the use of the Army or the Air Force would in the absence of express statutory authorization be prohibited under Section 1385 of title 18, United States Code.

Acts 1995, ch. 247, § 2; 2010, ch. 745, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. The Emergency Management Assistance Compact, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2025. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-246.

Attorney General Opinions. Disaster recovery volunteers and the State of Tennessee are immune for the negligent operation of a state vehicle by a volunteer en route to a requesting state under the Compact if traveling to a disaster is considered rendering aid in another state pursuant to this section; requesting states are required to provide representation to disaster recovery volunteers to the same extent they provide representation to their own agents, OAG 04-174 (12/17/04).

If not immune pursuant to this section, volunteers are immune as provided in T.C.A. § 9-8-307(h) in Tennessee, and the State of Tennessee is liable for their negligence, OAG 04-174 (12/17/04).

Legal protection of law enforcement officers who self-deploy in response to disasters, OAG 06-029 (2/8/06).

Ability of out-of-state health care professionals to provide emergency assistance in Tennessee, OAG 07-107 (7/13/07).